[USEMAP:titlebar2.jpg] Main .
Abstract .
Executive Summary.
Letter From The Superintendent .
Table of Contents
Purpose and Need .
Alternatives .
Affected Environment .
Environmental Consequences .
Merced Wild and Scenic River .
Consultation and Coordination
List of Preparers and Reviewers .
Glossary .
Bibliography .
Appendices
Yosemite Home .
Yosemite Planning Page
Chapter II: Alternatives
This section presents three alternative approaches for the future of the Cascades Diversion Dam.
The No Action Alternative represents the status quo; Alternative 2 involves complete removal of the dam, the dam abutments, the intake structure, and the screenhouse, and restoration of the dam site; and Alternative 3 involves complete removal of the dam, the river-left dam abutment, and the screenhouse on top of the intake structures, preservation of the river-right abutment and the intake structure as a viewing platform, and restoration of the dam site.
Each alternative discussion includes a summary of the overall approach, a narrative description of the alternative, and graphics detailing the alternative.
This section also provides a brief description of alternatives initially considered but not selected for further analysis.
Following the alternatives descriptions is a summary comparison of the alternatives, including key features and the environmental consequences of the alternatives.
This project tiers off of the Yosemite Valley Plan and its Record of Decision, the latter of which approved actions to remove Cascades Diversion Dam.
The alternatives in this chapter present a range of options to achieve the goal of dam removal.
Overview of the Alternatives
Alternative 1: No Action
The No Action Alternative maintains the status quo at Cascades Diversion Dam, as described in Chapter III, Affected Environment.
It provides a baseline from which to compare the action alternatives, to evaluate the magnitude of proposed changes, and to measure the environmental effects of those changes.
Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would remain in its existing condition, without maintenance or repair (figure II-1).
The hydroelectric generating facility was decommissioned in 1986, and no significant repairs to the dam have been made since that time.
Serious damage to the timber overflow crest of the dam was sustained during the 1997 flood (see photos).
There are voids under the existing timber crib sheathing, and many boards are on the verge of collapse.
Although no action would be taken under Alternative 1, the National Park Service would continue to make minor repairs to attendant structures such as the screenhouse, concrete platform, and safety railing on the intake structure.
The National Park Service would also remove large debris from the river and banks that has been deposited downstream due to continued deterioration of the dam over time.
Under the No Action Alternative, Cascades Diversion Dam would continue to pose a threat to public health and safety, potentially resulting in human fatality.
Although swimming and fishing are not allowed at the dam and adjacent areas, people occasionally walk on the dam's wooden crest and the exposed riverbanks and rocks in close proximity to the dam and could be exposed to hazards such as falling from the dam structure.
In addition, people recreating in the river near the dam could be exposed to hazards due to falling dam debris or dam failure.
FIGURE II-1 EXISTING FACILITIES [PDF]
Under the No Action Alternative, no management action would be taken to repair or remove the dam.
This condition of benign neglect (see Chapter VIII, Glossary) would be expected to eventually result in the uncontrolled failure of the overflow portion of the structure, due to large flood flows carrying debris or to continuing deterioration of the timber components under normal streamflow conditions.
Dam failure would likely occur during or following a period of high flow and could be sudden or could occur over a course of years or decades.
Damage to the timber overflow crest was sustained during the 1997 flood.
View from the river-right (looking upstream).
An uncontrolled failure or continued deterioration of the dam over time would result in a release of impounded water and the deposition of concrete and timber debris, grouted rockfill, and impounded sediment downstream of the dam.
Dam debris - concrete, timber, grouted rockfill - would litter the downstream channel of the Merced River, impeding free flow and harming resources such as habitat for sensitive species and scenic views of the river, and creating possible hazards to park facilities and visitors.
The National Park Service would employ early warning evacuation procedures for downstream areas in the event of an uncontrolled dam failure.
View from the river-right of the dam and intake structure (looking south).
All or portions of the concrete abutment structures on both banks and the intake structure would likely remain following failure of the overflow structure.
About 5,045 cubic yards of rock, concrete, and timber debris could be deposited downstream following dam failure.
Following dam failure, sediment that is impounded behind the dam would be transported downstream with riverflows.
The total estimated sediment behind the dam is 15,000 to 20,000 cubic yards, including a rock and sediment island that was present before the dam was constructed (see Chapter III, Affected Environment, Alluvial Processes); rock, cobble, and sediments that were excavated during dam construction and left in place upstream of the dam; and sediment that has accumulated since construction of the dam (Kennedy/Jenks 2002).
Some of this material would likely remain in the existing impoundment area following dam failure, and the island upstream of the dam is expected to remain relatively stable given its presence prior to dam construction.
Sediments are expected to wash downstream within the first year after complete dam failure (Kennedy/Jenks/Chilton and ROMA Design Group 1988).
Sediment transport is expected to be highest in March and April during spring snowmelt.
While some sediment would likely remain in the existing impoundment area, under the worst-case scenario (in which the full 15,000 to 20,000 cubic yards of sediment would be released), sediment transport would range from approximately 123 tons per day (April) to 173 tons per day (March) during this period.
Sediment concentrations are expected to range from 60 milligrams per liter (October through February) to 160 milligrams per liter (spring).
Most of the bedload would remain suspended through the steep gorge and sand and gravel would likely deposit in the vicinity of Cascades Picnic Area, where the slope is gentle (see figure II-2).
Coarse materials would deposit in the upper end of the reach, with finer material depositing throughout the reach.
The depth of the deposited material would depend upon the specific depositional patterns and riverflow.
Under the worst-case scenario (described above), the depositional width could range from 100 to 200 feet and the depositional length from 2,000 to 5,000 feet; given these ranges, the average depositional thickness would be from 0.4 to 2.7 feet at the Cascades Picnic Area.
Less than 1% of the material impounded behind the dam is finer than 0.07 millimeter in diameter.
The fine material would be transported downstream for some distance and would likely settle out and deposit in areas of low-flow energy, such as pools or downstream reservoirs.
The transported fine material would contribute minimally relative to background turbidity levels in the lower part of the river (NPS 2001a).
The largest increase of turbidity above background values (see Chapter III, Affected Environment, Alluvial Processes) would likely occur the first time the riverflows through the sediments formerly impounded by the dam.
This rise in turbidity would probably last on the order of a few hours.
After the initial rise in turbidity, there may be smaller spikes in turbidity as flood flows pass through the impoundment region and gradually erode more sediment and expose the fine material.
However, each successive turbidity spike should be smaller than the previous one until the turbidity levels return to normal (USBR 2001).
The National Park Service would remove dam debris from the Merced River as soon as feasible following dam failure or following the release of dam debris due to ongoing deterioration.
However, removal activities would not likely commence until low-flow conditions, which could be several months after dam failure or debris release.
Debris removal could occur in a single season (following sudden failure) or over the course of years or decades (continued deterioration).
Debris would not be removed where site access is unavailable.
Equipment that could be used during debris removal activities includes: cranes, excavators, backhoes, skid steer
FIGURE II-2 RIVER PROFILE [PDF]
loaders, trucks, graders, jackhammers, concrete saws, etc.
To the extent possible, cranes and other equipment would be operated from the riverbank; however, haphazard debris placement could require equipment to enter the river channel.
Debris removal activities would likely occur downstream of the Cascades Picnic Area.
However, under extreme high flows dam debris, particularly floatable debris such as timbers, could be transported as far downstream as El Portal, requiring removal efforts in this access well.
Due to the uncertainty regarding the amount of time required to remove debris and the amount of dam debris that could be recovered from the river, the cost and number of truck trips associated with debris removal under the No Action Alternative cannot be determined.
The channel of the Merced River would be expected to naturally narrow and deepen as impounded sediments wash downstream.
There would be a progressive lowering of the base level of the river channel until the river reach attains equilibrium.
Water levels are expected to lower slightly at the upstream end of the water impoundment, up to approximately 10 feet in some locations immediately upstream from the existing dam structure.
As described above, an island was already present upstream from the dam prior to dam construction.
This island would likely remain following dam failure.Local scour would occur at the slope where the diversion dam was located and is expected to develop into a channel incision that would proceed upstream (headcut) through the impoundment area.
Meander in the reach is anticipated to be minor, since the incision would tend to follow the channel course that existed prior to dam construction in 1917 (Kennedy/Jenks/Chilton and ROMA Design Group 1988; Kennedy/Jenks 2002).
Channel adjustment would be episodic, with periods of incision followed by sediment storage and then renewed incision.
The channel is expected to stabilize at or near its natural level over a period of years (Kennedy/Jenks/Chilton and ROMA Design Group 1988).
Due to the nature of the material in the channel - primarily boulders, cobbles, and gravels - little or no channel incision is anticipated upstream of the present impoundment.
The final bed profile would likely be a smooth slope connecting the reach downstream of the dam to the reach upstream of the dam.
Alternative 2: Complete Dam Removal (Preferred)
Alternative 2 includes complete removal of the dam, the dam abutments, the intake structure, and the screenhouse, and restoration of the related river channel located beneath the dam site (see figure II-3).
Approximately 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards of sediments (including rocks and boulders) in the area upstream of the dam would be excavated and repositioned to stabilize the river-right bank and decrease the potential for sediment erosion.
Figure II-4 indicates the river profile at Cascades Diversion Dam before and after removal of the dam structure and sediments.
Natural river processes would continue to transport remaining sediments (up to a maximum range of approximately 9,600 to 15,600 cubic yards of sediment) from the impoundment area over time, allowing for a gradual re-establishment of the natural river channel and related riparian habitat.
It is expected that the river would fully recover over time as sediments are transported from the impoundment area.
However, the rate of natural channel recovery and restoration would be monitored to determine if additional restoration actions were necessary.
Following removal of the river-right abutment, intake structure, and screenhouse, the river-right bank would be stabilized using a bioengineered bank stabilization system to prevent erosion.
The objective of this alternative would be to restore the natural river character with a mixture and distribution of boulders, cobbles, gravels, sand, silt, soil, and vegetation similar to those found in adjacent riverbank segments.
FIGURE II-3 Alternative 2 [PDF]
FIGURE II-4 Cascades Diversion Dam Profile [PDF]
In-channel work, bank stabilization, and revegetation would be completed within a two- to three-month period during the fall of 2003 (September through November) when the flow of the Merced River is typically lowest (less than 200 cubic feet per second).
The overall project duration would be approximately five months.
Dam removal would occur in three phases, as follows:
§ Phase 1 -Dam Removal Setup
- Detour traffic to the north side of El Portal Road to create a staging area adjacent to the dam site
- Install interpretive displays within the park
§ Phase 2 - Dam Removal
- Draw down impoundment (dewater) using the waste gates in the existing intake structure
- Install coffer dam to protect the active removal site from riverflows
- Establish temporary diversion channel crossing bridge near intake structure on the river-right bank
- Partially excavate impounded sediment near upstream face of dam
- Demolish timber overflow section of dam using large excavator on workpad
- Remove the river-left abutment concrete structure
- Excavate pilot channel upstream of sluiceway through sediment to river channel
- Divert riverflow through pilot channel and remove diversion channel crossing
- Remove remainder of dam and screenhouse and mechanical items from the river-right bank
- Remove the river-right abutment and intake structure; below-grade intake structure to remain
§ Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup
- Reconfigure excavated sediments along river-right bank for bioengineered bank stabilization system
- Install bioengineered bank stabilization system using native river rock and vegetation.
Match biological, visual, and structural characteristics of the upstream and downstream riverbanks
- Demobilize equipment, remove traffic detour and contractor use area, and repave parking area
Total estimated excavation volumes for Alternative 2 include:
§ Impounded Sediments^^[1] - 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards
§ Rock, Concrete, and Timber - 5,160 cubic yards
It is estimated that up to approximately 260 loaded truck trips^^[2] would be required to remove excavated rock, concrete, and timber under Alternative 2.
In addition, project activities would generate additional truck trips between the dam and a secondary project staging and storage area at Pohono Quarry.
The number of daily truck trips between the dam and the quarry would vary and is expected to be infrequent during most project activities, but could be as high as 20 trips per day during some project activities, such as during removal of timbers and rockfill.
The total estimated cost to implement Alternative 2 is between $2 and $2.6 million.
Description of Dam Removal Activities
Phase 1 - Dam Removal Setup
Vehicles and workers required for dam removal would access the site from either El Portal Road or Big Oak Flat Road.
El Portal Road would be temporarily realigned approximately 30 feet to the north through an existing paved parking area and previously disturbed earthen embankment (see figure II-3).
Although realigned to the north, two lanes of El Portal Road would be open during dam removal.
Staging for equipment access and storage would be immediately adjacent to the main stem of the Merced River upstream of the dam along the river-right bank (see figure II-3).
The staging area would occupy approximately 6,250 square feet (25 feet by 250 feet) of El Portal Road.
In addition, Pohono Quarry, located approximately one mile upstream of the dam, to the north of Pohono Bridge and El Portal Road, would be established as a secondary staging area for the storage of equipment that would be used infrequently during project activities (i.e., not needed on a daily basis), and for storage and sorting of material removed from the dam that would be reused, recycled, or disposed (outside the park).
Interpretive displays and information regarding the proposed project would be made available at the Yosemite Valley Visitor Center and/or the Cascades Picnic Area.
Phase 2 - Dam Removal
Dam removal activities would be performed during the low-flow conditions in the Merced River that typically occur from September through November.
The water level in the impoundment would be drawn down to approximately 7 feet below the dam crest, using the main and auxiliary waste gates in the existing intake structure (assuming a riverflow of approximately 200 cubic feet per second).
Additional drawdown capacity would be achieved by removing the stoplogs from the existing sluiceway near the river-left abutment, and by a partial breach of the timber cribbing near the river-left abutment.
Some transport of impounded sediments would be expected as the approach channels deepen, as well as headcut due to the lower impoundment level and higher flow velocities.
A temporary coffer dam would be installed to protect the active removal site from riverflows.
Riverflows would be shifted toward the river-right bank.
The river-left portion of the channel (active removal area) would be dewatered.
A temporary bridge would be installed near the entrance to the intake structure to permit equipment access across the diversion channel from the river-right bank to the exposed island immediately upstream of the central portion of the dam.
The temporary bridge would be constructed of a railroad flatcar (or similar structure) supported by precast concrete blocks or steel sheetpiling (installed by vibratory methods).
The sediments at the upstream face of the dam would be removed to expose the concrete headwall, with an assumed 3:1 backslope excavated between the base of the headwall and a level workpad.
For a 10-foot depth, this would place the top of the backslope approximately 30 feet from the headwall.
The workpad would be used to support equipment and would be built upstream of the dam using excavated sediments.
The concrete headwall would either be broken into pieces using a hoe ram attachment on a large tracked excavator (Caterpillar 375 or equivalent), or in sections along vertical joints.
Timber cribbing would be demolished in lifts from the workpad.
As the work progresses, additional sediment would be removed to expose the lower portions of the structure.
All other materials would be stockpiled for reuse on site and/or removed from the site for use within the park or disposal at an approved and licensed facility, as described below under Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup.
It is assumed that some of the interior rockfill has been grouted and would require greater effort to excavate.
Two rows of timber sheetpiles approximately 80 feet in length and 10 feet deep beneath the river-right half of the structure would also be removed, either using a mobile crane or an excavator bucket with a thumb attachment.
Unnecessary disturbance of boulders or bedrock within the river channel would be avoided.
All debris would be loaded into trucks for removal from the site, as describedbelow under Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup.
The river-left abutment structure consists of an L-shaped gravity wall with a total estimated concrete volume of 600 cubic yards.
The structure rises about 30 feet above its foundation to an elevation of 3,816 feet and is surrounded by trees and other riparian vegetation.
Following removal of the river-left abutment and overflow structures, a pilot channel would be excavated within the impounded sediments upstream of the existing sluiceway and roughly parallel to the river-left shoreline.
This channel would divert riverflow away from the river-right shoreline and facilitate removal of the river-right abutment, the intake structure, and the remainder of the dam.
The pilot channel would have a bottom width of 5 to 10 feet and sideslopes of 2:1, extending approximately 400 feet upstream; approximately 1,000 to 2,000 cubic yards of material would be excavated.
The invert of the pilot channel would be approximately 10 feet below the dam crest and would intersect the river channel approximately 500 feet upstream of the dam.
Excavated materials would be placed in temporary stockpiles for reuse during site restoration.
The pilot channel would convey approximately 500 cubic feet of water per second, with a variable depth of approximately 3 feet.
Minor transport of sediment is expected during the changeover in flow channels from the river-right to the river-left side of the river, and during initial operation of the pilot channel.
It is expected that periods of higher water flow would gradually widen the pilot channel to convey larger flows.
Following redirection of the riverflow away from the river-right side of the river and into the newly excavated pilot channel, removal of the remainder of the dam (approximately 40%), the river-right abutment, intake structure, and screenhouse would begin (see photo).
In-river activities and mechanical equipment would include individual operators for the two waste gates and for the penstock slide gate, a traveling fish screen, and a trashrack.
The reinforced-concrete deck, sidewalls, and air-vent pipe encasement (above the concrete penstock pipe) would be removed.
The below-grade portion of the intake structure would be retained.
The total volume of concrete and rock removed from the intake structure would be approximately 110 cubic yards.
Approximately 60 linear feet of stone wall would be installed along the roadway to connect adjacent wall segments.
Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup Under Alternative 2, the river-right abutment, intake structure, and screenhouse would be removed.
The last phase of the project is site restoration.
Once the dam and attendant structures are removed, the riverflow characteristics in the area are expected to change.
The approach channel immediately upstream of the dam would undergo gradual degradation from increased flow velocities.
The river is expected to cut a channel through the remaining impounded sediments, narrowing and deepening the river channel.
The river would divide into a river-right and river-left channel around the existing island above the dam site.
The decrease in riverbed elevation would necessitate the placement of bank slope protection on the river-right side of the channel (USBR 2001).
Exposed soil would be covered with a combination of locally acquired native duff and forest litter from adjacent riparian sites to provide immediate groundcover and facilitate natural revegetation of the site.
On the river-right bank, a bioengineered slope protection system would be installed to protect the riverbank from erosion upstream and downstream of the removed dam, and at the below-grade intake structure that would remain following dam removal (see figure II-3).
The bioengineered slope protection would be constructed of native vegetation and boulders and designed to match the natural conditions of upstream and downstream riverbanks to the extent possible (see figure II-5).
The bioengineered bank stabilization system would be constructed using standard techniques, including brush layering incorporated into a boulder structure.
Other materials may be incorporated, including logs and root wads.
Boulders would not be grouted into place.
Approximately 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards of excavated sediment (including native river rock/boulders) would be reconfigured on the river-right bank and incorporated into the bioengineered bank stabilization system.
Sediments excavated during dam removal are expected to generate enough rock and sediment to meet the needs of the river-right bank stabilization system.
No imported rock fill or riprap would be used (USBR 2001).
Equipment used to perform restoration activities may include excavators, bulldozers, loaders, cranes, dump trucks, pumps, and water trucks.
Restoration would be consistent with the project's U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Special Site Permit (refer to Chapter VI, Consultation and Coordination).
FIGURE II-5 BIOENGINEERED SLOPE PROTECTION [PDF]
The project area would be contoured and finished with sediments to facilitate both natural and assisted revegetation by native species that grow in the site-specific conditions present in the Cascades Diversion Dam area.
Appropriate planting prescriptions for revegetation have been developed, including appropriate plant species and their placement in relation to Merced River water levels.
Species suitable for planting adjacent to the water would include a variety of rush species (such as small-fruited bulrush, sedge, and beaked sedge), intermixed with willows (including sandbar willow, red willow, and arroyo willow).
Other species planted in this area may include horsetail, dogbane, and goldenrod.
Native grasses would be planted throughout the floodplain.
Herbaceous species would be re-established through hand-application of locally acquired mulch from adjacent sites that support these species and hand-application of seeds, minimizing the potential for introduction of non-native species.
Seedlings of appropriate species, such as white alder, would be planted within the bioengineered slope at the bankfull mark.
Black cottonwood and bigleaf maple cuttings would be planted near the upper limits of the riparian zone to match adjacent riparian vegetation patterns.
The site would be monitored in July (when maximum biomass is present, and to ensure the correct identification of herbaceous species) for five years to determine the success of the revegetation.
Based on monitoring results, additional planting or stabilization could be required, including mulching, seeding, and planting of seedlings and cuttings.
Any non-native plant species discovered would be removed.
Successful revegetation would establish a self-sustaining cover of native species that stabilize soil, trap sediment, provide wildlife habitat, and fulfill other basic functions of riparian ecosystems.
The natural regeneration of vegetation would be deemed successful if, after five years, the herbaceous species composition and cover is within 90% of the composition and cover of adjacent native riparian areas, and if the stem density of shrubs and trees is within 90% of natural stem densities of adjacent areas.
In addition, monitoring of river-channel morphology, bank conditions, and water quality (turbidity) would continue.
Following revegetation and bank stabilization, all dam-removal-related materials and equipment would be removed from the site.
El Portal Road would be realigned to its former location and the paved parking area would be returned to its pre-removal state.
In addition, all equipment stored at Pohono Quarry would be removed.
It is assumed that excavated sediment would be used for the site restoration activities described above.
However, if excess sediment remains, it would be dried on site at the island upstream of Cascades Diversion Dam and subsequently removed from the site for disposal at an approved and licensed facility or for reuse within the park.
Rockfill removed from the dam structure that is free of concrete would be used to support the site restoration activities described above or would remain in the riverbed.
Other material removed may be temporarily stored at Pohono Quarry, where materials would be sorted for reuse within the park, recycling, or disposal.
Consistent with the National Park Service's Guiding Principles of Sustainable Design (1993b), all infrastructure materials removed from the site (e.g., concrete, rock rubble, wood) would be recycled to the extent possible, at an approved and licensed facility, or reused within the park.
No metal, concrete, or timber materials would be disposed within the boundaries of Yosemite National Park.
All project materials that would not be reused within the park would be removed from Pohono Quarry upon completion of the project.
Once the dam is removed, some portion of the remaining sediment not removed by mechanical means would be transported downstream with riverflows.
The channel of the Merced River would be expected to naturally narrow and deepen as impounded sediments (up to a maximum range of approximately 9,600 to 15,600 cubic yards) wash downstream.
As described in Chapter III, Affected Environment, Alluvial Processes, and under the No Action Alternative, sediment and materials were present prior to dam construction, and some of these would likely remain following dam removal.
The island located upstream from the dam would likely remain following dam removal and would naturally become vegetated with native riparian species, further stabilizing sediments on the site.
Downstream sediment transport and evolution of natural channel dynamics under Alternative 2 would be the same as described under the No Action Alternative, with the following exceptions:
§ Up to a maximum range of approximately 9,600 to 15,600 cubic yards of sediment would wash downstream (compared to a maximum range of 15,000 to 20,000 cubic yards of sediment under the No Action Alternative)
§ Dam-related debris would not be washed downstream (compared to approximately 5,045 cubic yards of rock, concrete, and timber debris that could be deposited in the river and along the banks to the Cascades Picnic Area under the No Action Alternative)
§ Average sediment depositional thickness at Cascades Picnic Area would range from 0.3 to 2.1 feet (compared to 0.4 to 2.7 feet under the No Action Alternative)
Wild and Scenic River Segment Reclassification
Under the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, classifications (Wild, Scenic, or Recreational) are applied to each segment of the river corridor based on the existing conditions in that portion of the corridor.
The river segment at the dam from the top of the pool to 200 feet below the dam is classified as recreational due to the manmade impoundment at the site.
The river segments upstream and downstream of the dam are classified as scenic, a designation reserved for sections of rivers that are "free of impoundments, with shorelines or watersheds still largely primitive and shorelines largely undeveloped, but accessible in places by roads."
Upon implementation of Alternative 2, the river segment through the dam site would be restored to a free-flowing state, near natural conditions.
It would then be reclassified as scenic, as is called for in the Merced River Plan.
Alternative 3: Partial Dam Removal
Alternative 3 includes complete removal of the dam, the river-left dam abutment, and the screenhouse on the river-right intake structure, and restoration of the related river channel located beneath the dam site (see figure II-6).
Under this alternative, the river-right dam abutment and intake structure would be retained for use as a river viewing platform.
Approximately 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards of sediments (including rocks and boulders) in the area upstream of the dam would be excavated and repositioned to stabilize the river-right bank and decrease the potential for sediment erosion.
Figure II-4 indicates the river profile at Cascades Diversion Dam before and after removal of the dam structure and sediments.
Natural river processes would continue to transport remaining sediments (up to a maximum range of approximately 9,600 to 15,600 cubic yards of sediment) from the impoundment area over time, allowing for a gradual re-establishment of the natural river channel and related riparian habitat.
It is expected that the river would fully recover incrementally over time, as sediments are transported from the impoundment area.
However, the rate of natural channel recovery and restoration would be monitored to determine if additional restoration actions were necessary.
Following removal of the dam and screenhouse, the river-right bank would be stabilized upstream and downstream of the intake structure using a
FIGURE II-6 ALTERNATIVE 3 [PDF]
bioengineered bank stabilization system to prevent erosion of the river-right bank.
The objective of this alternative would be to restore the natural river character with a mixture and distribution of boulders, cobbles, gravels, sand, silt, soil, and vegetation similar to those found in adjacent riverbank segments.
In-channel work, bank stabilization, and revegetation would be completed within a two- to three-month period during the fall of 2003 (September through November) when flow of the Merced River is typically lowest (less than 200 cubic feet per second).
The overall project duration would be approximately five months.
Dam removal would occur in three phases, as follows:
§ Phase 1 - Dam Removal Setup
- Detour traffic to the north side of El Portal Road to create a staging area adjacent to the dam site
- Install interpretive displays within the park
§ Phase 2 - Dam Removal
- Draw down impoundment (dewater) using the waste gates in the existing intake structure
- Install coffer dam to protect the active removal site from riverflows
- Establish temporary diversion channel crossing bridge near intake structure on the river-right bank
- Partially excavate impounded sediment near upstream face of dam
- Demolish timber overflow section of dam using large excavator on workpad
- Remove the river-left abutment concrete structure
- Excavate pilot channel upstream of sluiceway through sediment to river channel
- Divert riverflow through pilot channel and remove diversion channel crossing
- Remove remainder of dam and screenhouse
- Install concrete apron over the top of the intake structure and install a safety railing to create river-viewing platform
- Install interpretive displays within the project area
- Install sidewalk and curbing between vehicle turnout and the river-viewing platform
§ Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup
- Reconfigure excavated sediments along river-right bank for bioengineered bank stabilization system
- Install bioengineered bank stabilization system using native river rock and vegetation; match biological, visual, and structural characteristics of the upstream and downstream riverbanks
- Demobilize equipment and remove traffic detour and contractor use area
- Remove and revegetate the former parking area
Total estimated excavation volumes for Alternative 3 include:
§ Impounded Sediments^^[3] - 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards
§ Rock, Concrete, and Timber - 5,050 cubic yards
It is estimated that approximately 255 loaded truck trips^^[4] would be required to remove excavated materials under Alternative 3.
In addition, project activities would generate additional truck trips between the dam and a secondary project staging and storage area at Pohono Quarry.
The number of daily truck trips between the dam and the quarry would vary and is expected to be infrequent during most project activities, but could be as high as 20 trips per day during some project activities, such as during removal of timbers and rockfill.
The total estimated cost to implement Alternative 3 is between $2 and $2.6 million.
Description of Dam Removal Activities
Phase 1 - Dam Removal Setup
Dam removal setup under Alternative 3 would be the same as described under Alternative 2.
Phase 2 - Dam Removal
Under Alternative 3, the screenhouse would be removed and the river-right abutment and intake structure would be retained as a viewing platform.
Dam removal activities under Alternative 3 would be the same as described under Alternative 2, with the exception of activities at the river-right dam abutment and intake structure.
Following redirection of the riverflow away from the river-right bank and into a newly excavated pilot channel (see description of dam removal activities under Alternative 2), removal of the remainder of the dam (approximately 40%) and screenhouse would begin (see photo).
In-river activities and mechanical equipment would include individual operators for the two waste gates and for the penstock slide gate, a traveling fish screen, and a trashrack.
The river-right dam abutment and the intake structure would be retained as a viewing platform by covering the structure with a 6-inch reinforced-concrete pad and installing approximately 75 linear feet of handrail around the perimeter of the intake deck.
Exhibits documenting the history of the dam and its relationship to park history would be installed in the river-viewing platform area.
In addition, a 5-foot-wide sidewalk would be installed between the vehicle turnout to the west and the viewing platform, with concrete curbing installed between El Portal Road and the sidewalk.
Phase 3 - Site Restoration and Cleanup
Site restoration, cleanup, downstream sediment transport, and evolution of natural channel dynamics under Alternative 3 would be the same as described under Alternative 2.
Bank stabilization along the river-right, upstream and downstream of the intake structure, would be required under Alternative 3, as the retained dam abutment and intake structure would not provide bank protection from erosion as the Merced River returns to more natural conditions upstream and downstream of the structure.
See the description of bank stabilization under Alternative 2.
Following revegetation, bank stabilization, and realignment of El Portal Road to its former location, the paved parking area, public telephone, and trash cans north of El Portal Road would be removed.
The existing parking lot would be contoured to create a variety of microhabitats and would be revegetated with a combination of upland tree and shrub species, primarily canyon live oak, California black oak, ponderosa pine, and Mariposa manzanita.
Drier-site riparian species, including California bay-laurel and black cottonwood, would also be used.
The tree and shrub species would be planted as seedlings in densities representative of nearby areas with similar slope and aspect characteristics.
Herbaceous species, including native lupines, lotus, California fushia, and grasses, would be seeded onto the site following contouring.
Native forest litter and duff from adjacent areas would be applied to the site to protect seeds from predation and to minimize soil moisture loss as seedlings become established.
Further seeding, mulching, and planting could be required as the result of site monitoring, which would occur for five years to determine the success of the revegetation.
Success of this revegetation would be evaluated in conjunction with the river-right bank stabilization and revegetation.
Visitor parking in the El Portal Road/Big Oak Flat Road intersection area would be restricted to the turnout to the west of the intersection, along the river-right bank.
Wild and Scenic River Segment Reclassification
Under the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act, classifications (Wild, Scenic, or Recreational) are applied to each segment of the river corridor based on the existing conditions in that portion of the corridor.
The river segment at the dam from the top of the pool to 200 feet below the dam is classified as recreational due to the manmade impoundment at the site.
The river segments upstream and downstream of the dam are classified as scenic, a designation reserved for sections of rivers that are "free of impoundments, with shorelines or watersheds still largely primitive and shorelines largely undeveloped, but accessible in places by roads."
Upon implementation of Alternative 3, the river segment through the dam site would be restored to a free-flowing state, near natural conditions.
It would then be reclassified as scenic as is called for in the Merced River Plan.
Alternatives Considered but Dismissed
The following alternatives are not addressed in the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project Environmental Assessment for one or more of the following reasons:
§ The alternative does not meet the project's Purpose and Need
§ Less environmentally damaging or less expensive options are available
§ The alternative would cause unacceptable environmental, cultural, or social impacts
§ The alternative conflicts with the guidance and direction provided in the Merced River Plan (NPS 2001a)
§ The alternative conflicts with the guidance and direction provided in the Yosemite Valley Plan (NPS 2000a)
Remove Cascades Diversion Dam and Complete Sediment Removal
Removal of the Cascades Diversion Dam in conjunction with complete removal of the 15,000 to 20,000 cubic yards of sediment in the upstream impoundment would remove sediments that were present prior to construction of the dam in 1917.
As described in Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences, Alluvial Processes, a rock and sediment island already existed immediately upstream of the dam prior to construction.
The quantity of sediment present prior to dam construction is not known.
Removal of sediment present prior to dam construction would not result in the re-establishment of a near-natural river channel and related riparian habitat.
In addition, this alternative would require 700 to 750 truck trips to remove dam materials and sediment and would entail a project duration of seven months.
This would result in greater impacts to air quality, traffic and access, and recreation-related experience than the action alternatives considered in this environmental assessment.
Restore Cascades Diversion Dam and Hydroelectric Generating Facility
Repair of Cascades Diversion Dam and the entire hydroelectric generating facility to fully functioning capacity would require complete removal and reconstruction of the dam overflow structure; reconstruction of approximately one mile of penstock, which would need to be installed under El Portal Road (Highway 140); reconstruction of the tailrace (or outlet channel); and purchase and installation of new generating equipment in the powerhouse.
Removal of the dam overflow structure would occur as described under Alternative 2 above.
The new overflow structure could utilize a system of lightweight galvanized steel members bolted together in a series of adjoining closed-face bins backfilled with native gravel and cobble materials.
Although this alternative would alleviate the high-hazard condition of the dam, consistent with the project's Need, it is inconsistent with the Purpose of the project to remove an unnatural obstruction on the Merced River and to restore the river's free-flowing condition, consistent with the Merced River Plan (NPS 2001a) and Yosemite Valley Plan (NPS 2000a).
Replace Cascades Diversion Dam with Boulders
This option would require complete removal of the dam overflow structure and installation of large boulders at the current dam site to impound water and limit downstream sediment transport.
This option would perpetuate unnatural conditions at the site, limiting free flow of the Merced River and other natural processes.
Similar to the above scenario, this option is inconsistent with the purpose of the project.
Remove Portions of the Dam Over Time
This option would remove the dam overflow structure, abutments, and the intake structure in phases over a series of years, ultimately resulting in complete removal of all structures and impounded sediments.
Although this option meets the purpose of the project, it has potential to create substantial environmental effects.
Phased removal of the dam over a period of years would expand removal-related impacts.
For example, transportation- and recreation-related effects of removal would last years instead of one season.
Removing only a portion of the dam's overflow structure in the first season could destabilize remaining structures and could result in uncontrolled failure.
Uncontrolled failure of the remaining structures would have downstream impacts on resources and free flow of the Merced River and has potential to adversely affect park facilities, recreational uses, and visitors, similar to the No Action Alternative.
Therefore, this alternative would not be consistent with the Need for this project.
Combine the Removal of Cascades Diversion Dam with the Final Phase of the El Portal Road Improvement Project
The National Park Service intends to remove Cascades Diversion Dam, let natural processes prevail through this reach of the Merced River, and allow the river to stabilize.
If the National Park Service decides to proceed with the El Portal Road Improvement Project - Cascades Dam to Pohono Bridge, potential future designs will need to comply with the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act as well as other legislation and park planning documents.
Although the Cascades Diversion Dam Removal Project is completely distinct from the El Portal Road Improvement Project, the road improvement project is included in the cumulative impact analysis in this document because it is a reasonably foreseeable project that the National Park Service may decide to pursue (see Appendix E, Projects Included in the Cumulative Impact Analysis).
Mitigation Measures Common to All Action Alternatives
To ensure that implementation of the proposed action protects natural, cultural, and social resources and the free-flowing condition of the Merced River corridor, a consistent set of mitigation measures would be applied during project implementation to avoid, minimize, and mitigate adverse impacts.
Sustainable Design and Aesthetics
The project shall avoid or minimize impacts to natural, cultural, and social resources.
The project shall be designed to work in harmony with the surroundings, particularly the Merced River transition between Yosemite Valley and the downstream gorge.
The project shall reduce, minimize, or eliminate air and water nonpoint-source pollution.
The project shall be sustainable whenever practicable, by recycling or reusing materials, by minimizing materials, and by minimizing energy consumption during the project.
Best Management Practices During Dam Removal
The National Park Service (and its contractors) shall implement the following best management practices, as appropriate, prior to, during, and/or after dam removal.
Specific tasks would include, but are not limited to, the following:
§ Inspect the project to ensure that impacts stay within the parameters of the project and do not escalate beyond the scope of the environmental assessment, as well as to ensure that the project conforms with the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Special Site Permit, Cascades Dam Removal (as amended), Merced River Cascades Restoration Report, the Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board Waiver of Waste Discharge Requirements and Water Quality Certification, Cascades Dam Removal, and other applicable permits or project conditions.
§ Implement compliance monitoring to ensure the project remains within the parameters of National Environmental Policy Act and National Historic Preservation Act compliance documents, U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Section 404 permits, etc.
Compliance monitoring would ensure adherence to mitigation measures and would include reporting protocols.
§ Implement natural resource protection measures.
Standard measures include demolition scheduling, biological monitoring, erosion and sediment control, use of fencing or other means to protect sensitive resources adjacent to the work area, and revegetation.
The measures include specific monitoring by resource specialists as well as treatment and reporting procedures.
§ Implement the requirements of the 1999 Programmatic Agreement between the National Park Service, the State Historic Preservation Officer, and the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation for the "Resolution of Adverse Effects" associated with planning construction, operations, and maintenance activities within Yosemite National Park (i.e., review of project design, avoidance of sensitive cultural resource areas, monitoring of project activities as appropriate, ongoing tribal consultation).
§ Implement the requirements of the 1999 Agreement between the National Park Service and the American Indian Council or Mariposa County, Inc. for conducting traditional activities.
§ Confine work areas within the river channel, such as workpads to support demolition equipment, to the smallest area necessary.
§ Limit the amount of rock and sediment required for the river-right bank bioengineereed bank stabilization to the minimum required to stabilize and protect the slope from erosion.
Amount shall be determined in consultation with National Park Service resources management staff during final project design.
§ Steam-clean heavy equipment prior to its entry into the park to prevent importation of non-native plant species, and repair all petroleum leaks prior to work near the Merced River.
Tighten hydraulic hoses and ensure they are in good condition.
§ To minimize the possibility of hazardous materials seeping into soil or water, check equipment frequently to identify and repair any leaks, as directed in the spill prevention and countermeasure plan.
Standard measures include hazardous materials storage and handling procedures; spill containment, cleanup, and reporting procedures; and limitation of refueling and other hazardous activities to upland/nonsensitive sites.
Provide an adequate hydrocarbon spill containment system (e.g., floatable absorption boom, absorption materials, etc.) on site, in case of unexpected spills in the project area.
Ensure equipment allowed within the river channel is equipped with a hazardous spill containment kit.
Ensure that personnel trained in the use of hazardous spill containment kits are on site at all times during dam removal activities.
§ Store all construction equipment within the delineated work limits.
§ Implement measures to reduce effects of dam removal on visitor safety and experience.
Safeguard visitors, contractors, and park personnel from removal activities.
Implement a barrier plan indicating locations and types of barricades to protect public health and safety.
§ Provide information about recreational closures and the location, timing, and duration of work activity to visitors as they enter the park.
Flag and/or fence off work areas to maintain visitor safety during both work and nonwork hours.
§ Implement an interpretation and education program.
Continue directional signs and education programs to promote understanding among park visitors.
§ Implement a traffic control plan, as warranted.
Include strategies to maintain safe and efficient traffic flow during the project work period.
§ Ensure an emergency notification program is in place.
Standard measures include notification of utilities and emergency response units prior to demolition activities.
Identify locations of existing utilities prior to removal activity to prevent damage to utilities, particularly the wastewater lines that pass under El Portal Road within the project area.
The Underground Services Alert and National Park Service maintenance staff shall be informed 72 hours prior to any ground disturbance.
Demolition shall not proceed until the process of locating existing utilities is completed (wastewater, electric, and telephone lines).
An emergency response plan shall be required of the contractor for measures that will be taken during all high-water events during dam removal, such as evacuation of personnel, equipment, and materials from the river, etc.
§ Avoid damage to natural surroundings in and around the work limits.
Provide temporary barriers to protect existing trees, plants, and root zones, if necessary, as determined by vegetation management staff.
Trees and other vegetation shall not be removed, injured, or destroyed without prior written approval.
Ropes, cables, or fencing shall not be fastened to trees.
All existing resource protection fencing (post and rope) shall be left in place and protected from heavy equipment.
§ Remove all tools, equipment, barricades, signs, surplus materials, and rubbish from the project work limits upon project completion.
Repair any asphalt surfaces that are damaged due to work on the project to original condition.
Remove all debris from the project site, including all visible concrete, timber, and metal pieces.
Grade disturbed areas and rake them smooth to eliminate tire tracks and tripping hazards.
§ Locate, contain, and stabilize excavated and stored materials within the upland staging areas and prevent re-entry into the river.
§ Implement standard noise abatement measures during work.
Standard noise abatement measures include the following elements: a schedule that minimizes impacts to adjacent noise-sensitive uses, use of the best available noise control techniques wherever feasible, use of hydraulically or electrically powered impact tools when feasible, and location of stationary noise sources as far from sensitive uses as possible (see Chapter III, Affected Environment, Noise).
Ensure all construction equipment is equipped with mufflers kept in proper operating conditions, and, when possible, shut off equipment rather than allowing it to idle.
§ If deemed necessary, demolition work on weekends or federal government holidays may be authorized, with prior written approval of the Superintendent.
To the extent possible, perform all on-site noisy work above 76 dBA (such as the operation of heavy equipment) between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. to minimize disruption to nearby park users.
§ Use silt fences, sedimentation basins, etc. in work areas to reduce erosion, surface scouring, and discharge to water bodies, as defined in the erosion control plan prepared for this project.
§ Delineate wetlands and apply protection measures during construction.
Wetlands shall be delineated by qualified National Park Service staff or certified wetland specialists and clearly marked prior to work.
Perform activities in a cautious manner to prevent damage caused by equipment, erosion, siltation, etc.
Resource-Specific Measures
Hydrology, Floodplains, and Water Quality
§ Prepare an erosion control plan specifying measures to prevent erosion/sedimentation problems during project construction.
Include a map of the project site delineating where erosion control measures will be applied.
Include the following minimum criteria, as listed in the Guidelines for Protection of Water Quality During Construction and Operation of Small Hydro Projects (CVRWQCB 1983):
- Construction equipment shall not be operated in flowing water, except as may be necessary to construct crossings or barriers.
- Where working areas are adjacent to or encroach on live streams, barriers shall be constructed that are adequate to prevent the discharge of turbid water in excess of specified limits.
- Material from construction work shall not be deposited where it could be eroded and carried to the stream by surface runoff or high stream flows.
- All permanent roads shall be surfaced with materials sufficient to maintain a stable road surface.
- All disturbed soil and fill slopes shall be stabilized in an appropriate manner.
- Surface drainage facilities shall be designed to transport runoff in a nonerosive manner.
- Riparian vegetation shall be removed only when absolutely necessary.
- There shall be no discharge of petroleum products, cement washings, or other construction materials.
- Erosion control measures shall be in place prior to dam removal and maintained in good repair.
- Stream diversion structures shall be designed to preclude accumulation of sediment.
If this is not feasible, an operation plan shall be developed to prevent adverse downstream effects from sediment discharges.
§ Erosion control measures shall be inspected daily during dam removal and monthly following removal, and repaired as required.
§ Waters shall be free of changes in turbidity that cause a nuisance or adversely affect beneficial uses.
Increases in turbidity attributable to controllable water quality factors shall not exceed the following limits, as described in The Water Quality Control Plan for the Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board (CVRWQCB 1998).
In determining compliance with the limits below, appropriate averaging periods may be applied, provided that beneficial uses will be fully protected:
- Where natural turbidity is between 0 and 5 Nephelometric Turbidity Units (NTUs), increases shall not exceed 1 NTU.
- Where natural turbidity is between 5 and 50 NTUs, increases shall not exceed 20%.
- Where natural turbidity is between 50 and 100 NTUs, increases shall not exceed 10 NTUs.
- Where natural turbidity is greater than 100 NTUs, increases shall not exceed 10%.
§ Implement stormwater management measures to reduce nonpoint-source pollution discharge.
This could include measures such as oil/sediment containment or street sweeping.
§ Remove hazardous waste materials generated during implementation of the project from the project site immediately.
§ Dispose of volatile wastes and oils in approved containers for removal from the project site to avoid contamination of soils, drainages, and watercourses.
Keep absorbent pads, booms, and other materials onsite during projects that use heavy equipment to contain oil, hydraulic fluid, solvents, and hazardous materials spills.
Vegetation
§ Implement a noxious weed abatement program.
Standard measures include, as appropriate, the following elements: ensure that vehicles and equipment arrive onsite free of mud or seed-bearing material, certify all seeds and straw material as weed-free, identify areas of noxious weeds before dam removal, treat noxious weeds or noxious weed topsoil prior to work (e.g., topsoil segregation and removal), and revegetate with appropriate native species.
§ Cover exposed soil with a combination of locally acquired native duff and forest litter from adjacent riparian sites to provide immediate groundcover and facilitate natural revegetation.
§ Implement the planting prescriptions prepared for this project.
§ Develop and implement a monitoring plan to ensure successful revegetation, maintain plantings, and replace unsuccessful plantings.
§ Use native or seed-free mulch to minimize surface erosion and introduction of non-native plants.
§ Confine all construction operations to specified project work limits.
Install temporary barriers to protect natural surroundings (including trees, plants, and root zones) from damage.
Avoid fastening ropes, cables, or fences to trees.
§ As much as possible, removed plants and materials (cuttings) shall be salvaged and stored on site for revegetation following dam removal.
Wildlife
§ Implement measures to reduce bear/human encounters.
Measures include worker education on bear behavior; enforcement of park regulations; and removal of regular trash, all food-related items, and rubbish to bear-proof containers.
§ Minimize night lighting during work.
Where night lighting is necessary, design lighting to be minimal, directed downward, and shielded.
§ Educate workers on the dangers of intentional or unintentional feeding of park wildlife, and on inadvertent harassment through observation or pursuit.
Bird Species
§ To avoid conflicts with nesting birds, conduct activities outside the breeding season (typically from March to August).
§ Remove trees or structures with unoccupied nests (stick nests or cavities) prior to March 1, or following the nesting season.
Alternatively, if activities take place during the breeding season, a qualified biologist shall conduct a pre-work survey for individuals no more than two weeks prior to construction in March through August.
If any special-status species is observed nesting, a determination shall be made as to whether or not the proposed action will impact the active nest or disrupt reproductive behavior.
If it is determined that the action will not impact an active nest or disrupt breeding behavior, work shall proceed without any restriction or mitigation measure.
If it is determined that dam removal activities will impact an active nest or disrupt reproductive behavior, then avoidance strategies shall be implemented.
Dam removal activities could be delayed within 500 feet of such a nest until a qualified biologist determines that the subject birds are not nesting or until any juvenile birds are no longer using the nest as their primary day and night roost.
Mammal Species
§ Ensure excavation sites (trenches or pits) have suitable ramps to allow small mammals to exit these areas.
§ A qualified biologist shall be available to inspect all excavations before refilling occurs, ensuring that special-status species are passively relocated to avoid incidental take.
§ Erect exclosure fencing prior to activities to ensure that no special-status species are within the work area.
Special-Status Species
Special-Status Aquatic Species
Implementation of the following conservation and protection measures would reduce or eliminate potential taking of special-status aquatic species.
§ Work activities within potential special-status aquatic species habitat shall be completed during low-flow conditions.
§ All work adjacent to or within aquatic habitats shall be regularly monitored.
§ All fueling and maintenance of vehicles and equipment shall occur at least 65 feet from any aquatic habitat.
§ The total area of activity shall be limited to the minimum necessary to achieve the project goal, as determined collaboratively with contractors and National Park Service staff (including resources management staff).
§ During dewatering, intakes shall be completely screened with wire mesh not larger than 5 millimeters to prevent aquatic species from entering the system.
Release or pump water downstream at an appropriate rate to maintain downstream flows during work.
Upon completion of activities, remove barriers to flow in a manner that allows flow to resume with the least disturbance to the substrate.
§ Fence the downstream work boundary to limit the movement of aquatic species into the work area to the actively flowing water area of the channel and to control creek siltation and disturbance to downstream riparian habitat.
An exclosure fence shall be installed in the creek channel both upstream and downstream of activities, as appropriate.
Install fences at least four weeks prior to the commencement of any activities.
Immediately after installation of the exclosure fence, a qualified biologist shall inspect all areas within the fence for aquatic species.
Special-Status Species of Bats
§ A qualified biologist shall conduct surveys in the spring and immediately prior to dam removal to determine whether trees or other habitat (e.g., crevices) that would be affected by the proposed action provide hibernacula or nursery colony roosting habitat.
§ If special-status species of bats are found breeding within the vicinity of the proposed action, no blasting shall occur between May 1 and September 1.
§ If spring surveys reveal that the site is being used as a nursery colony, the action shall not occur until after August 15, when the pups are weaned and are volant.
§ If surveys conducted immediately prior to dam removal do not reveal any bat species present within the project area, then the action shall begin within three days to prevent the destruction of any bats that could move into the area after the survey.
§ Snags shall not be removed without prior approval from a National Park Service wildlife biologist and/or plant ecologist.
Riparian vegetation shall be retained to the extent possible to preserve important foraging habitat.
Air Quality
§ Implement a dust abatement program.
Contractors shall implement the following measures:
- Water all active work areas, access roads and paths, parking areas, and staging areas at least twice daily (use of dust abatement products would not be allowed).
Ensure that applied water does not enter the Merced River.
- Cover all trucks hauling dam debris and other loose materials that could spill onto paved surfaces, or require all trucks to maintain adequate freeboard.
- All paved areas that are subject to vehicle and pedestrian traffic shall be kept clean of debris and soils.
Sweeping of these areas shall be implemented as necessary.
- Cover all stockpiles.
- Limit traffic speeds on unpaved roads and paths and around the project site.
§ Implement vehicle emissions controls.
Contractors shall implement the following measures:
- Use California on-road diesel fuel for all diesel-powered equipment.
- Use equipment that is properly tuned and maintained in accordance with manufacturers' specifications.
- Avoid unnecessary emissions.
Engines of trucks and vehicles in loading and unloading areas shall be turned off when not in use.
Comparison of Alternatives
This section compares the key features of each of the alternatives and summarizes the potential impacts.
Table II-1 shows the comparison of key features, and table II-2 displays potential impacts summarized from Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences.
The three alternatives presented in this document represent a reasonable range of options for Cascades Diversion Dam.
Under the No Action Alternative, existing conditions and management practices would continue for Cascades Diversion Dam.
Summary of Environmental Consequences
Table II-2 summarizes the key impacts that could result from each of the alternatives, including the No Action Alternative.
Detailed descriptions of these impacts are provided in Chapter IV, Environmental Consequences.
Summary Comparison of Key Features of the Alternatives
Key Features
Alternatives
Alternative 1: No Action
Alternative 2: Complete Dam Removal
Alternative 3: Partial Dam Removal
Estimated cost
Continue existing repairs^a
$2 to $2.6 million
$2 to $2.6 million
Estimated total duration of removal
0
5 months
5 months
Estimated duration of in-channel removal
0
2 to 3 months
2 to 3 months
Estimated total volume of dam materials (rock, concrete, and timber) removed from the site
0
up to 5,160 cubic yards
up to 5,050 cubic yards
Estimate total volume of sediment excavated (including rock/boulders)
0
4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards
4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards
Estimated total volume of material reconfigured onsite
0
3,000 cubic yards of sediment and 1,500 cubic yards river rock
3,000 cubic yards of sediment and 1,500 cubic yards river rock
Estimated total volume of materials deposited downstream
Up to 20,000 to 25,000 cubic yards of dam-related debris, rock and sediment (includes rocks/boulders)
9,600 to 15,600 cubic yards of sediment (includes rocks/boulders)
9,600 to 15,600 cubic yards of sediment (includes rocks/boulders)
Estimated total thickness of sediment deposited in the vicinity of Cascades Picnic Area
0.4 to 2.7 feet
0.3 to 2.1 feet
0.3 to 2.1 feet
Estimated number of loaded truck trips
--^a
260
255
Site restoration and stabilization
No
Yes
Yes
Materials recycled
No
Yes
Yes
^a The cost and number of truck trips associated with removal of dam debris from the river due to continued deterioration and eventual failure.
Table II-2
Summary of Environmental Consequences
Alternative 1 No Action
Alternative 2 Complete Dam Removal
Alternative 3 Partial Dam Removal
NATURAL RESOURCES
GEOLOGY, GEOLOGIC HAZARDS, AND SOILS
Continued degradation and eventual failure of the dam and retrieval of dam debris would cause bank destabilization, erosion, and soil loss, resulting in local, short- and long-term, moderate, adverse impacts to soil resources.
Under Alternative 1, rockfall events would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse effect on public health and safety.
Dam removal would result in a short-term impact to soils as a result of ground disturbance activities.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of best management practices.
Since Alternative 2 would avoid the more extensive adverse effects described under Alternative 1 (i.e., bank destabilization, erosion, and soil compaction and loss due to uncontrolled dam failure and debris retrieval activities), Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, minor, beneficial effect on soil resources compared to Alternative 1.
Site restoration and stabilization would reduce the potential for erosion and sedimentation, help stabilize channel shape and slopes, repair banks, and increase the protection of riverbanks, the adjacent roadway, and utility lines under El Portal Road, resulting in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on soils.
Compared to Alternative 1, Alternative 2 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect on public health and safety with respect to geologic hazards.
Dam removal would have a short-term impact to soils as a result of ground disturbance activities.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of best management practices.
Since Alternative 3 would avoid the more extensive adverse effects of bank destabilization, erosion, and soil compaction and loss due to uncontrolled dam failure and debris retrieval activities described under Alternative 1, Alternative 3 would have a local, short-term, minor, beneficial effect on soil resources compared to Alternative 1.
Site restoration and stabilization would reduce the potential for erosion and sedimentation, help stabilize channel shape and slopes, repair banks, and increase the protection of riverbanks, the adjacent roadway, and utility lines under El Portal Road, resulting in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on soils.
Compared to Alternative 1, retention of the intake structure as a viewing platform would result in a local, long-term, negligible, adverse impact to public health and safety, due to potential damage to the viewing platform from geologic hazards.
The cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial cumulative impact on soil resources.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to public safety in the project region, due to the overall reduction in the density of facilities in the talus slope and rockfall shadow zones.
The local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to soil resources under the cumulative projects would be somewhat diminished by the potential soil erosion and bank destabilization under Alternative 1, resulting in a net local, long-term, negligible, beneficial impact to soil resources.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions would result in a long-term, minor, beneficial cumulative impact to soil resources and to public health and safety with respect to geologic hazards.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to soil resources and public safety with respect to geologic hazards.
Alternative 2 would avoid the more extensive adverse effects of soil erosion and bank destabilization compared to Alternative 1.
Overall, the cumulative projects would restore soils in the project region, reduce soil degradation, and decrease the density of people and facilities in the talus slope zone.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions would result in a long-term, minor, beneficial cumulative impact to soil resources and to public health and safety with respect to geologic hazards.
Overall, the cumulative projects would restore soils in the project region, reduce soil degradation, and decrease the density of people and facilities in the talus slope zone.
Alternative 3 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to soil resources and public safety with respect to geologic hazards.
Alternative 3 would avoid the more extensive adverse effects of soil erosion and bank destabilization that would occur under Alternative 1.
HYDROLOGY, FLOODPLAINS, AND WATER QUALITY
Alternative 1 would have local, short-term, moderate, adverse impacts on hydrologic processes and water quality, due to continued deterioration and eventual failure of the dam and subsequent debris retrieval activities.
Over the long term, the failed dam would be removed and more natural river hydrology would be restored in this area, which would have a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on hydrologic processes.
Dam removal would have a short-term water quality impact related to the discharge of petroleum components.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of best management practices.
Compared to Alternative 1, Alternative 2 would have local, short- and long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial impact on hydrologic processes and water quality by avoiding bank erosion and localized flooding associated with continued deterioration and eventual dam failure, reducing sedimentation, and controlling removal of the dam.
Dam removal would have a short-term water quality impact related to the discharge of petroleum components.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of best management practices.
Compared to Alternative 1, Alternative 3 would have a local, short- and long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial impact on hydrologic processes and water quality by avoiding bank erosion and localized flooding associated with continued deterioration and eventual dam failure, reducing sedimentation, and controlling removal of the dam.
Overall, the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to hydrologic processes and water quality.
The past, present, and future projects in the Merced River watershed, considered cumulatively with Alternative 1, would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to hydrologic processes and water quality.
The long-term beneficial effects associated with dam failure under Alternative 1 would contribute to the beneficial cumulative effects, and largely offset the short-term adverse effects associated with the continued deterioration and eventual failure of the dam.
The cumulative projects would result in an overall local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to hydrologic processes and water quality.
The past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects considered cumulatively with Alternative 2 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact on hydrologic processes.
The beneficial impacts associated with Alternative 2 would nominally contribute to overall beneficial cumulative impacts on hydrologic processes and water quality.
The cumulative projects would result in an overall local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to hydrologic processes and water quality.
The past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects considered cumulatively with Alternative 3 would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact on hydrologic processes.
The beneficial impact associated with Alternative 3 would nominally contribute to the overall beneficial cumulative impact on hydrologic processes and water quality.
WETLANDS
In the near term, Cascades Diversion Dam would remain and would continue to adversely affect the size, connectivity, and integrity of wetlands in the immediate vicinity of the dam, particularly palustrine forest and riverine habitats.
Cascades Diversion Dam would degrade and eventually fail.
Dam materials and impounded sediments would be released downstream and could affect riparian and aquatic resources during transport (e.g., large dam debris could remove riparian trees), upon deposition, or during debris retrieval activities, resulting in a local, short-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact to wetland resources.
Although natural stabilization of the riparian and aquatic community would occur over time, restoration would not be complete for 10 or more years; therefore, this impact is considered a local, long-term, minor to moderate, adverse effect on wetland and aquatic habitats.
Dam removal activities would have a short-term impact to wetland and aquatic habitat resources associated with ground disturbance and the potential introduction of pollutants.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of mitigation, reducing the adverse effect to a negligible intensity.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on wetland and aquatic habitat compared to Alternative 1.
Removal of Cascades Diversion Dam would restore the free-flowing condition of the Merced River and return this portion of the river to a more natural state, thereby enhancing its biological integrity.
Alternative 2 would result in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial effect on wetland and aquatic resources compared to Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities would have a short-term impact to wetland and aquatic habitat resources associated with ground disturbance and the potential introduction of pollutants.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of mitigation, reducing the adverse effect to a negligible intensity.
Therefore, Alternative 3 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on wetland and aquatic habitat compared to Alternative 1.
Removal of the overflow portion of Cascades Diversion Dam and the river-left abutment would restore the free-flowing condition of the Merced River and return this portion of the river to a more natural state, thereby enhancing its biological integrity.
Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on wetland and aquatic resources compared to Alternative 1.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of wetland resources within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, major, beneficial cumulative effect on wetland and aquatic resources.
Although Alternative 1 would have a local, short-term, negligible to minor, adverse effect and a local, long-term, minor to moderate, adverse effect on wetland and aquatic habitats in the vicinity of the dam, the cumulative projects would overshadow the effects of Alternative 1, resulting in a net long-term, major, beneficial effect on wetland patterns within the Merced River corridor.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of wetland resources within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, major, beneficial cumulative effect on wetland and aquatic resources.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects in combination with Alternative 2 would have a net long-term, major, beneficial effect on wetland patterns within the Merced River corridor.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of wetland resources within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, major, beneficial cumulative effect on wetland and aquatic resources.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects in combination with Alternative 3 would have a net long-term, major, beneficial effect on wetland patterns within the Merced River corridor.
VEGETATION
In the near term, Cascades Diversion Dam would remain and would continue to adversely affect the size, connectivity, and integrity of vegetation in the immediate vicinity of the dam, particularly palustrine forest and riverine habitats.
Cascades Diversion Dam would degrade and eventually fail.
Dam materials and impounded sediments would be released downstream and could affect downstream vegetation, especially riparian vegetation, during transport (e.g., large dam debris could remove riparian trees), upon deposition, or during debris retrieval activities, resulting in a local, short-term, negligible to moderate, adverse impact to vegetation.
Although natural stabilization of river-associated vegetation would occur over time, restoration would not be complete for 10 or more years; therefore, this impact is considered a local, long-term, minor, adverse effect on vegetation.
Dam removal activities would have a short-term impact to vegetation associated with ground disturbance and the potential introduction of pollutants.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of mitigation, reducing the adverse effect to a negligible intensity.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on vegetation compared to Alternative 1.
Removal of Cascades Diversion Dam would restore the free-flowing condition of the Merced River and return this portion of the river to a more natural state, thereby enhancing its biological integrity.
The re-establishment of the riparian corridor along this portion of the river would have a local, long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on streamside vegetation in the vicinity of Cascades Diversion Dam compared to Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities would have a short-term impact to vegetation associated with ground disturbance and the potential introduction of pollutants.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of mitigation, reducing the adverse effect to a negligible intensity.
Therefore, Alternative 3 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on vegetation compared to Alternative 1.
Removal of the overflow portion of Cascades Diversion Dam and the river-left abutment would restore the free-flowing condition of the Merced River and return this portion of the river to a more natural state, thereby enhancing its biological integrity.
Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on vegetation compared to Alternative 1.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of vegetation within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, major, beneficial cumulative effect on vegetation.
Although Alternative 1 would have a local, short-term, negligible to moderate, adverse effect and a local, long-term, minor, adverse effect on vegetation, the cumulative projects would overshadow the effects of Alternative 1, resulting in a net long-term, major, beneficial effect on vegetation patterns within the Merced River corridor.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of vegetation within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, major, beneficial cumulative effect on vegetation.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects in combination with Alternative 2 would have a net long-term, major, beneficial effect on vegetation patterns within the Merced River corridor.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of vegetation within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, major, beneficial cumulative effect on vegetation.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects in combination with Alternative 3 would have a net long-term, major, beneficial effect on vegetation patterns within the Merced River corridor.
WILDLIFE
In the near term, Cascades Diversion Dam would remain and would continue to adversely affect the size, connectivity, and integrity of wildlife and aquatic habitat in the immediate vicinity of the dam.
Cascades Diversion Dam would degrade and eventually fail.
Dam materials and impounded sediments would be released downstream and could have both beneficial and adverse affects on aquatic wildlife resources.
Bank erosion and dam retrieval activities could result in a local, short-term, negligible to moderate, adverse impact on wildlife.
Although natural stabilization of the riparian and aquatic community would occur over time, restoration would not be complete for 10 or more years; therefore, this impact is considered a long-term effect.
Overall, Alternative 1 would result in a local, long-term, minor to moderate, adverse impact to aquatic wildlife habitat and associated native fish and wildlife.
Dam removal activities would have a short-term impact to wildlife associated with ground disturbance and the potential introduction of pollutants.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of mitigation, reducing the adverse effect to a negligible intensity.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on wildlife compared to Alternative 1.
Removal of Cascades Diversion Dam would restore the free-flowing condition of the Merced River and return this portion of the river to a more natural state, thereby enhancing the biological integrity of this segment for native fish and wildlife.
The re-establishment of the riparian corridor along this portion of the river would have a local, long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on fish and wildlife habitat in the vicinity of Cascades Diversion Dam compared to Alternative 1.
Same as Alternative 2
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of native fish and wildlife habitat within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial cumulative effect for wildlife.
Therefore, past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions, in combination with Alternative 1, would have a net long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on native fish and wildlife within the Merced River corridor.
Overall, the cumulative projects would increase the size, connectivity, and integrity of native fish and wildlife habitat within the watershed, resulting in a long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial cumulative effect for wildlife.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects in combination with Alternative 2 would have a net long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on fish and wildlife patterns within the Merced River corridor.
Same as Alternative 2
SPECIAL-STATUS SPECIES
In the near term, Cascades Diversion Dam would remain and would continue to adversely affect the size, connectivity, and integrity of habitat for Wawona riffle beetle and harlequin duck in the immediate vicinity of the dam, resulting in a continued minor to moderate, adverse impact on beetles and their habitat.
Cascades Diversion Dam would degrade and eventually fail, creating a local, short-term, moderate, adverse impact on individuals or habitat for Wawona riffle beetle and harlequin duck that occur downstream of the dam.
In the impoundment area, eventual dam failure would return this area to a more natural condition, creating an overall local, long-term, minor to moderate, beneficial effect on Wawona riffle beetle and harlequin duck by increasing habitat for the species.
Alternative 1 is unlikely to significantly affect special-status species of bats or the California spotted owl in the vicinity of Cascades Diversion Dam.
Dam removal activities would have a short-term impact to special-status species associated with ground disturbance and the potential introduction of pollutants.
However, dam removal activities would occur in a controlled manner, with the application of mitigation, reducing the adverse effect to a negligible intensity.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on special-status species compared to Alternative 1.
Removal of Cascades Diversion Dam and revegetation would restore the free-flowing condition of the Merced River and return this portion of the river to a more natural state, thereby enhancing the biological integrity of this segment for Wawona rifle beetle and harlequin duck, resulting in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect on habitat for Wawona riffle beetle and harlequin duck at this location.
The bioengineered bank stabilization and revegetation would have a local, long-term, negligible to minor, beneficial effect on habitat for special-status bats and California spotted owl at this location.
Same as Alternative 2
Full implementation of cumulative projects planned or approved within the watershed would have a long-term, moderate, beneficial cumulative effect on habitat for special-status species by enhancing habitat connectivity, size, and structure within Yosemite Valley and throughout the Merced River corridor.
Therefore, past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions in combination with Alternative 1 could have a net long-term, moderate, beneficial effect on special-status species within the corridor of the Merced River.
Full implementation of cumulative projects planned or approved within the watershed would have a long-term, moderate, beneficial cumulative effect on habitat for special-status species by enhancing habitat connectivity, size, and structure within Yosemite Valley and throughout the Merced River corridor.
Past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future projects in combination with Alternative 2 would have a net long-term, moderate, beneficial effect on habitat for special-status species within the Merced River corridor.
Same as Alternative 2
AIR QUALITY
Emissions associated with maintenance activities prior to dam failure and debris removal after dam failure under Alternative 1 would result in a local, short-term, negligible to moderate, adverse impact to air quality.
There would be no long-term impact on air quality under Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities would result in a short-term air quality impact associated with vehicle emissions.
Because dam removal and sediment excavation would occur in a controlled manner and would include the application of best management practices, Alternative 2 would avoid the more extensive adverse effects of debris retrieval activities on air quality described under Alternative 1.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on air quality compared to Alternative 1.
Alternative 2 would not result in a long-term impact to air quality.
Same as Alternative 2
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect on air quality in the Merced River corridor.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact on air quality.
Alternative 1 would reduce the intensity of this beneficial impact to negligible in the short term, due to emissions that would be generated during maintenance activities and debris removal after dam failure.
Cumulative actions would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact on air quality.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact on air quality.
Dam removal under Alternative 2, as compared to Alternative 1, would contribute to beneficial impacts on air quality in the short term.
Same as Alternative 2
NOISE
Noise generated by routine maintenance and debris removal activities under Alternative 1 would result in a local, short-term, negligible to moderate, adverse impact to the ambient noise environment.
There would be no long-term impact on the noise environment under Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities would result in short-term noise impacts associated with equipment operation.
Because dam removal would occur in a controlled manner and would include the application of best management practices, Alternative 2 would avoid the more extensive adverse effects of noise generated by debris retrieval activities on the ambient noise environment described under Alternative 1.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect on the ambient noise environment compared to Alternative 1.
Same as Alternative 2
Over the long term, the cumulative projects would result in a net local, long-term, minor, adverse effect on the noise environment.
Alternative 1 would contribute to this cumulative impact in the short term.
The cumulative actions would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse effect on the noise environment.
The local, short-term, negligible, beneficial effect under Alternative 2 would not improve this cumulative effect and, overall, Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse effect on the noise environment.
Same as Alternative 2
CULTURAL RESOURCES
ARCHEOLOGICAL RESOURCES
There would be no change in the treatment and management of archeological resources as a result of Alternative 1.
Dam failure and subsequent bank erosion could have a long-term adverse effect on archeological resources in the vicinity of the dam downstream to Cascades Picnic Area.
Any site-specific planning and compliance actions would be performed in accordance with stipulations in the park's 1999 Programmatic Agreement.
Overall, Alternative 1 would result in a local, long-term, minor to moderate, adverse impact to archeological resources.
Ground-disturbing activities under Alternative 2 could have a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact to as-yet unknown archeological resources.
Any actions would be performed in accordance with stipulations in the park's 1999 Programmatic Agreement.
Same as Alternative 2
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact on archeological resources, due to the potential disturbance of such resources.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact on archeological resources.
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact on archeological resources, due to the potential disturbance of such resources.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact on archeological resources.
Same as Alternative 2
ETHNOGRAPHIC RESOURCES
There would be no change in the treatment and management of ethnographic resources as a result of Alternative 1.
Dam failure and subsequent bank erosion could have a long-term adverse effect on ethnographic resources in the vicinity of the dam downstream to Cascades Picnic Area.
Any actions taken by the National Park Service would be performed in accordance with stipulations in the park's 1999 Programmatic Agreement, and the park would continue to consult with culturally associated American Indian tribes under this Programmatic Agreement and the cooperative agreement for traditional uses.
Overall, Alternative 1 would result in a local, long-term, minor to moderate, adverse impact to ethnographic resources
Ground-disturbing activities under Alternative 2 could affect ethnographic resources.
Any actions would be performed in accordance with stipulations in the park's 1999 Programmatic Agreement, such as disturbance avoidance or culturally sensitive design measures.
In addition, the park would continue to consult with culturally associated American Indian tribes under this Programmatic Agreement and the cooperative agreement for traditional uses.
Therefore, Alternative 2 would result in a local, short-term, negligible, adverse impact to ethnographic resources.
Same as Alternative 2
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on ethnographic resources due to the disturbance of such resources.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on ethnographic resources.
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on ethnographic resources due to the disturbance of such resources.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the main stem of the Merced River would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on ethnographic resources.
Same as Alternative 2
CULTURAL LANDSCAPE RESOURCES, INCLUDING HISTORIC SITES AND STRUCTURES
Uncontrolled dam failure would result in the loss of the dam, a cultural resource, and could cause damage to downstream elements of the Yosemite Hydroelectric Power Plant, the Merced Canyon Travel Corridor, or the Coulterville Stage Road, thus affecting the cultural landscape.
Because demolition, relocation, and/or rehabilitation of all components of the Yosemite Hydroelectric Power Plant have been evaluated and the National Park Service has complied with all stipulation of the 1986 Memorandum of Agreement, and because any actions undertaken by the National Park Service (i.e., debris removal) would be performed in accordance with stipulations in the park's 1999 Programmatic Agreement, the adverse impact would be somewhat reduced to moderate.
Controlled removal of Cascades Diversion Dam under Alternative 2 would be conducted in compliance with stipulations in the park's 1999 Programmatic Agreement, and compliance with the 1986 Memorandum of Agreement is already complete; therefore, Alternative 2 would result in a local, long-term, moderate, adverse impact to the cultural landscape.
Same as Alternative 2
The cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on the cultural landscape due to the disturbance of cultural landscape resources.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on such resources.
The cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on the cultural landscape due to the disturbance of cultural landscape resources.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on such resources.
Same as Alternative 2
SOCIAL RESOURCES
TRANSPORTATION
Under Alternative 1, the continued use of the parking area would constitute a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect on traffic flow.
Under Alternative 1, continued use of the parking area by visitors for access to the intake structure would constitute a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact to traffic safety.
Maintenance-related activities prior to dam failure under Alternative 1 would result in a local, short-term, negligible, adverse impact to traffic flow.
Emergency response and debris removal activities under Alternative 1 would result in a local, short-term, minor to moderate, adverse impact to traffic flow.
Under Alternative 2, avoidance of the traffic conflict to sightseers would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact compared to Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities would result in a short-term increase in vehicle trips in the project area.
Controlled dam removal using best management practices under Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial impact on traffic flow compared to Alternative 1.
Under Alternative 3, removal of the parking lot would have a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact on traffic flow.
There would be a local, long-term, negligible, beneficial impact associated with traffic conflicts compared to Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities would result in a short-term increase in vehicle trips in the project area.
Controlled partial dam removal using best management practices under Alternative 3 would have a local, short-term, negligible, beneficial impact on traffic flow compared to Alternative 1.
Collectively, the cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on transportation conditions along the Merced River corridor.
Construction activities associated with the development of cumulative projects, however, would reduce the intensity of this beneficial impact to a minor or moderate level in the short term.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on transportation conditions along the Merced River corridor.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on transportation conditions along the Merced River corridor.
Construction activities associated with the development of cumulative projects, however, would reduce the intensity of this beneficial impact to a minor or moderate level in the short term.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on transportation conditions along the Merced River corridor.
Controlled dam removal under Alternative 2 would contribute to this beneficial impact in the short term, as compared to Alternative 1.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on transportation conditions along the Merced River corridor.
Construction activities associated with the development of cumulative projects, however, would reduce the intensity of this beneficial impact to a minor or moderate level in the short term.
Alternative 3 and the cumulative projects would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on transportation conditions along the Merced River corridor.
Controlled dam removal under Alternative 3 would contribute to this beneficial impact in the short term, as compared to Alternative 1.
SCENIC RESOURCES
Alternative 1 would result in a local, short-term, minor, adverse impact to scenic resources within the Merced River corridor downstream to the Cascades Picnic Area.
Prior to dam failure, the dam in its deteriorating condition would continue to visually intrude on the scenic character of this area of the river corridor and on views from the Merced River, its banks, and El Portal Road.
Dam failure under Alternative 1 would ultimately eliminate a landscape feature that currently contrasts with and detracts somewhat from the scenic resource values of the Merced River.
Thus, Alternative 1 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to scenic resources in this portion of the Merced River corridor.
In avoiding the effects associated with uncontrolled dam deterioration and eventual failure, which include deposition of debris in the river channel and visually prominent damage to the riverbanks and vegetation, Alternative 2 would have a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on scenic resources.
The long-term effects of dam removal would be beneficial under both Alternative 1 and Alternative 2.
However, due to the bank stabilization and restoration efforts included, Alternative 2 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to scenic resources compared to Alternative 1.
In avoiding the effects associated with uncontrolled dam deterioration and eventual failure, which include deposition of debris in the river channel and visually prominent damage to the riverbanks and vegetation, Alternative 3 would have a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on scenic resources.
The long-term effects of dam removal would be beneficial under both Alternative 1 and Alternative 3.
However, due to the bank stabilization and restoration efforts included, Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to scenic resources compared to Alternative 1.
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial cumulative impact on scenic resources along the Merced River corridor because of the overall emphasis of these projects on restoring disturbed or developed land to natural conditions and improving the health of ecosystems.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects within the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on scenic resources in the Merced River corridor, due to the overall emphasis on restoring disturbed or developed land to natural conditions, improving the health of ecosystems, and eliminating Cascades Diversion Dam.
These beneficial effects would outweigh the short-term adverse effect associated with Alternative 1 and the cumulative development-related projects.
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on scenic resources along the Merced River corridor because of the overall emphasis on restoring disturbed or developed land to natural conditions and improving the health of ecosystems.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects within the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on scenic resources in the Merced River corridor.
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on scenic resources along the Merced River corridor because of the overall emphasis on restoring disturbed or developed land to natural conditions and improving the health of ecosystems.
Alternative 3 and the cumulative projects within the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, major, beneficial impact on scenic resources in the Merced River corridor.
RECREATION
The potential for injury and/or fatality due to pedestrian hazards on El Portal Road and to falls from the dam structure would constitute a local, short-term, moderate, adverse impact to active recreational activities in the immediate vicinity of the dam.
The potential for injury and/or fatalities in the event of dam failure would constitute a local, short-term, moderate, adverse impact to active recreational activities in the immediate vicinity of the dam as well as downstream to Cascades Picnic Area.
The effects of dam failure on water quality and flows would result in a local, short-term, moderate, adverse impact to active recreation downstream from the dam to the Cascades Picnic Area.
Temporary obstruction and/or closure of existing roads, parking areas, and trails from the dam area to Cascades Picnic Area and associated delays during cleanup operations after dam failure would result in a local, short-term, minor, adverse effect on recreational access in this reach.
Over the long term, no impacts on recreational resources would be expected.
Compared to Alternative 1, elimination of the potential for injury and/or fatality to river-related recreation users under Alternative 2 would be a local, short-term, moderate, beneficial impact on recreation; a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on river-dependent recreation; and a local, short-term, negligible to minor, beneficial effect on recreational access.
Elimination of the potential for injury and/or fatality to river-related recreation users would be a local, short-term, moderate, beneficial impact on recreation; a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on river-dependent recreation; and a local, short-term, negligible to minor, beneficial effect on recreational access.
Compared to Alternative 1, Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, negligible to minor, adverse effect on recreational access associated with the permanent removal of the parking area in the Cascades Diversion Dam vicinity.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial effect on recreation due to expanded recreational opportunities in the Merced River corridor and improved transit service to more park destinations.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects in the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on recreation due to expanded recreational opportunities in the Merced River corridor and improved transit service to more park destinations.
The local, short-term, minor to moderate, adverse impact on river-related recreational activities resulting from dam failure would be offset by the beneficial impacts of the cumulative projects.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial effect on recreation due to expanded recreational opportunities in the Merced River corridor and improved transit service to more park destinations.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects in the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on recreation due to expanded recreational opportunities in the Merced River corridor and improved transit service to more park destinations.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial effect on recreation due to expanded recreational opportunities in the Merced River corridor and improved transit service to more park destinations.
Alternative 3 and the cumulative projects in the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, moderate, beneficial impact on recreation due to expanded recreational opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
The local, long-term, negligible to minor, adverse effect on recreational access associated with the permanent removal of the parking area near Cascades Diversion Dam would be offset by the beneficial impact of the cumulative projects.
ORIENTATION AND INTERPRETATION
Dam failure under Alternative 1 could affect orientation and interpretation opportunities, resulting in a local, short-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact to orientation (i.e., roadside signs) and interpretation opportunities downstream from the dam to the Cascades Picnic Area.
Under Alternative 2, the inclusion of interpretation opportunities during dam removal activities and avoidance of the potential for dam debris and erosion to affect downstream orientation and interpretation opportunities would be a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on orientation and interpretation compared to Alternative 1.
Under Alternative 3, the inclusion of interpretation opportunities during dam removal activities and avoidance of the potential for dam debris and erosion to affect downstream orientation and interpretation opportunities would be a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on orientation and interpretation compared to Alternative 1.
Because Alternative 3 would include interpretive displays in the project area and Alternative 1 would have no long-term effect, Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to orientation and interpretation opportunities compared to Alternative 1.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect due to expanded orientation and interpretation opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
Alternative 1 and the cumulative projects in the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact due to expanded orientation and interpretation opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
The local, short-term, negligible to minor, adverse impact on orientation and interpretation opportunities resulting from dam failure would be offset by the beneficial impact of the cumulative projects.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect due to expanded orientation and interpretation opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
Alternative 2 and the cumulative projects in the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact due to expanded orientation and interpretation opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
The cumulative projects would have a local, long-term, minor, beneficial effect due to expanded orientation and interpretation opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
Alternative 3 and the cumulative projects in the Merced River corridor would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact due to expanded orientation and interpretation opportunities in the Merced River corridor.
SOCIOECONOMICS
Due to the uncertainty regarding the magnitude and timing of project-related equipment spending associated with potential dam failure, economic impacts cannot be definitively projected.
Given currently available information, however, it is expected that Alternative 1 would have a regional, short-term, negligible, beneficial impact on the socioeconomy due to the temporary nature of the dam debris removal activity and the small magnitude of spending for debris removal compared with the size of the construction industry in the affected region.
Alternative 2 would have a direct economic impact of $1.9 to $2.5 million and an indirect and induced impact of $0.9 to $1.1 million, which would result in a short-term, negligible, beneficial impact on the regional economy.
Same as Alternative 2
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of Yosemite National Park would result in a local, long-term, negligible, beneficial impact to the regional economy, and a local, short-term, major, beneficial impact during construction.
Alternative 1 would contribute to this effect.
The cumulative projects within and in the vicinity of Yosemite National Park would result in a local, long-term, negligible, beneficial impact to the regional economy, and a local, short-term, major, beneficial impact during construction.
Alternative 2 would contribute to this local, short-term, beneficial impact due to temporary spending on dam removal activities.
Same as Alternative 2
PARK OPERATIONS
Dam failure could result in a short-term (immediate) and dramatic increase in demand for the full range of park operations and emergency response staff to respond to evacuation and medical emergencies, remove dam debris, and repair damaged facilities downstream from the dam to the Cascades Picnic Area, a local, short-term, moderate to major, adverse impact.
In addition, uncontrolled failure of the dam could damage the wastewater line and electrical conductors for Yosemite Valley.
This would have a local, long-term, moderate to major, adverse effect on park facilities, depending on the nature and extent of damages.
Under Alternative 1, continued use of the parking area and public telephone would constitute a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact to park operations.
Alternative 2 would avoid potential catastrophic damage to park facilities, resulting in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impact compared to Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities could result in damage to park facilities.
Controlled dam removal under this alternative, with the application of mitigation measures, would have a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on park operations, due to the reduced demands on park operations staff compared to Alternative 1, which would require an emergency response to dam failure and damaged facilities.
Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, minor, beneficial impacts on park facilities because of the avoidance of potential catastrophic damage to park facilities compared to Alternative 1.
Dam removal activities could result in damage to park facilities.
Controlled dam removal under this alternative, with the application of mitigation measures, would have a local, short-term, minor, beneficial impact on park operations due to the reduced demands on park operations staff compared to Alternative 1, which would require an emergency response to manage dam failure and repair potentially damaged facilities.
Long-term minor repairs to the river-viewing platform under Alternative 3 would result in a local, long-term, minor, adverse impact to park operations compared to Alternative 1.
Overall, the past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions would have a local, moderate, adverse cumulative impact because of the increased demand on park operations, services, and facilities, over both the short and long term.
These cumulative effects, in combination with Alternative 1, would result in a local, short- and long-term, moderate to major, adverse impact on park operations and facilities, depending upon the nature and extent of damage to facilities.
Overall, the past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions would have a local, moderate, adverse cumulative impact because of the increased demand on park operations, services, and facilities, over both the short and long term.
These cumulative effects, in combination with Alternative 2, would result in a local, short- and long-term, moderate, adverse impact on park operations and facilities, due to the increased demand these projects would place on park operations, services, and facilities.
The minor beneficial effects under Alternative 2 would not offset the adverse effects associated with the cumulative projects.
Overall, the past, present, and reasonably foreseeable future actions would have a local, moderate, adverse cumulative impact because of the increased demand on park operations, services, and facilities, over both the short and long term.
These cumulative effects, in combination with Alternative 3, would result in a local, short- and long-term, moderate, adverse impact on park operations and facilities, due to the increased demand these projects would place on park operations, services, and facilities.
The minor beneficial effects under Alternative 3 would not offset the adverse effects associated with the cumulative projects.
^^[1] All 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards of sediment would be reconfigured on the river-right bank to facilitate restoration and revegetation.
^^[2] Assuming a truck capacity of 20 cubic yards.
The number of truck trips includes round-trip travel to and from the work site.
^^[3]^ All 4,400 to 5,400 cubic yards of impounded sediment would be reconfigured on the river-right bank to facilitate restoration and revegetation.
^^[4]^ Assuming a truck capacity of 20 cubic yards.
The number of truck trips includes round-trip travel to and from the work site.
Main .
Abstract .
Executive Summary.
Letter From The Superintendent .
Table of Contents
Purpose and Need .
Alternatives .
Affected Environment .
Environmental Consequences .
Merced Wild and Scenic River .
Consultation and Coordination
List of Preparers and Reviewers .
Glossary .
Bibliography .
Appendices
Yosemite Home .
Yosemite Planning Page
